Mississippi, session 2026, SB2579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the Small Municipalities Federal Match Fund created in the General Laws of 2026, not otherwise appropriated, to the Department of Finance Administration for the purpose of disbursing funds to small municipalities which receive discretionary federal funds for the period beginning on July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027....................................................... ................................................. $5,000,000.00. SECTION 2.  (1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the funds appropriated in Section 1 shall be provided for matching funds to draw down federal funds for qualifying small municipalities under the Small Municipalities Federal Match Fund created in the General Laws of 2026. (2)  As a condition of receiving and expending the funds appropriated to the department in this act, the department shall set a match rate of twenty percent (20%) local funds contributed by the small municipality to eighty percent (80%) federal funds received. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated in this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the Small Municipalities Federal Match Fund, not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer, and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.